Hawaii, session 2026, HB259.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  Section 11-92.1, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended to read as follows: "§11-92.1  Election proclamation; establishment of a new precinct; voter service centers and places of deposit; changes to precinct boundaries. (a)  The clerk shall issue a proclamation listing all voter service centers and places of deposit, including the days each voter service center and place of deposit is open and the hours of operations and location of each voter service center and place of deposit, as may have been determined by the clerk as of the proclamation date and whenever a new precinct is established in any representative district.  There shall be at least one voter service center for each county council district. The clerk shall use public schools as voter service centers whenever practicable.  The clerk shall advertise for volunteer support staff for voter service centers.  On election day, each county council district shall feature one voter service center open for in-person voting.  The clerk shall make arrangements for the rental or erection of suitable shelter for the establishment of a voter service center whenever public buildings are not available and shall cause these voter service centers to be equipped with the necessary facilities for lighting, ventilation, and equipment needed for elections on any island.  This proclamation may be issued jointly with the proclamation required in section 11-91. (b) No change shall be made in the boundaries of any precinct later than 4:30 p.m. on the tenth day before the close of filing for an election. (c) Notwithstanding subsection (a), and pursuant to section 15-2.5, the clerk is not required to establish voter service centers for precincts affected by natural disasters, as provided in section 15-2.5." SECTION 2.  New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 3.  This Act shall take effect on July 1, 2025. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________